Connecticut, session 2026, SB00454.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 7-131n of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
If any municipality takes, converts or repurposes any land, including,
but not limited to, any land in such municipality's possession, for
highway or other nonpark or nonopen space purposes, which land was
purchased or acquired for park or other recreational or open space
purposes, or for which bonds were issued for such purposes, or which
had been dedicated for such purposes, such municipality shall provide
comparable replacement land at least equal in value and per unit area
size to the value and per unit area size of the land taken, converted or
repurposed; provided before such municipality takes, converts or
repurposes such land for highway or other nonpark or nonopen space
purposes it shall hold a public hearing in addition to any public hearing
required by section 13a-58 or by any other section of the general statutes
or by any special act or city charter. At such public hearing and in the
notice thereof, the municipality shall set forth the description of the land
LCO No. 2418 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 454
proposed to be taken, converted or repurposed and the proposed use of
such land, any reasons for the proposed taking, conversion or
repurposing of the parkland, recreational space or open space rather
than other land and the description of the replacement land to be
provided. The municipality shall give notice of the time and place of
such hearing by publication in a newspaper having a substantial
circulation in such municipality, such notice to be given at least twice,
at intervals of not less than two days, the first not more than fifteen days
nor less than ten days and the second not less than two days before such
hearing and such hearing shall be held within a period of not more than
thirty and not less than fifteen days after any other public hearing
required by section 13a-58 or by any other section of the general statutes.
For purposes of this section "municipality" means any town, city or
borough, or other political subdivision of the state.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 7-131n